src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
irregular-verb ;
regular-verb ;


LEXICON LIGGE
ligge+V+Inf:ligge # ;
ligge+V+Imp:ligg # ;
ligge+V+Ind+Prs:ligg # ;
ligge+V+Ind+Prt:låg # ;
ligge+V+PrfPtc:lege # ;
ligge+V+PrsPtc:liggjande # ;
ligge+V+Imp:ligg # ;

LEXICON GJØRE
gjøre+V+Inf:gjøre # ;
gjøre+V+Imp:gjør # ;
gjøre+V+Ind+Prs:gjør # ;
gjøre+V+Ind+Prt:gjorde # ;
gjøre+V+PrfPtc:gjort # ;
gjøre+V+PrsPtc:gjørande # ;
gjere+V+Inf:gjere # ;
gjere+V+Imp:gjer # ;
gjere+V+Ind+Prs:gjer # ;
gjere+V+Ind+Prt:gjorde # ;
gjere+V+PrfPtc:gjort # ;
gjere+V+PrsPtc:gjerande # ;

LEXICON BLI
bli+V+Inf:bli # ;
bli+V+Imp:bli # ;
bli+V+Ind+Prs:blir # ;
bli+V+Ind+Prt:blei # ;
bli+V+PrfPtc:blitt # ;
bli+V+PrsPtc:blivande # ;

verte+V+Inf:verte # ;
verte+V+Imp:vert # ;
verte+V+Ind+Prs:vert # ;
verte+V+Ind+Prt:vart # ;
verte+V+PrfPtc:vorte # ;
verte+V+PrsPtc:vertande # ;

LEXICON TA
ta+V+Inf:ta # ;
ta+V+Imp:ta # ;
ta+V+Ind+Prs:tar # ;
ta+V+Ind+Prt:tok # ;
ta+V+PrfPtc:tatt # ;
ta+V+PrfPtc:teke # ;
ta+V+PrfPtc:teki # ;
ta+V+PrsPtc:takande # ;

LEXICON SJÅ
se+V+Inf:sjå # ;
se+V+Imp:sjå # ;
se+V+Ind+Prs:ser # ;
se+V+Ind+Prt:såg # ;
se+V+PrfPtc:sett # ;
se+V+PrsPtc:sjåande # ;

LEXICON SEIE
seie+V+Inf:seie # ;
seie+V+Imp:sei # ;
seie+V+Ind+Prs:seier # ;
seie+V+Ind+Prt:sa # ;
seie+V+PrfPtc:sett # ;
seie+V+PrsPtc:seiande # ;

LEXICON GÅ
gå+V+Inf:gå # ;
gå+V+Imp:gå # ;
gå+V+Ind+Prs:går # ;
gå+V+Ind+Prt:gikk # ;
gå+V+Ind+Prt:gjekk # ;
gå+V+PrfPtc:gått # ;
gå+V+PrsPtc:gåande # ;

LEXICON BE
be+V+Inf:be # ;
be+V+Imp:be # ;
be+V+Ind+Prs:ber # ;
be+V+Ind+Prt:ba # ;
be+V+PrfPtc:bede # ;
be+V+PrfPtc:bedi # ;
be+V+PrsPtc:beande # ;

LEXICON GI
gi+V+Inf:gi # ;
gi+V+Imp:gi # ;
gi+V+Ind+Prs:gir # ;
gi+V+Ind+Prt:ga # ; 
gi+V+Ind+Prt:gav # ;
gi+V+PrfPtc:gitt # ;
gi+V+PrsPtc:givande # ;


ved BLI ;
ute BLI ;
for BLI ;

av TA ;
be TA ;
inn TA ;
ut TA ;

av SJÅ ;
be SJÅ ;
inn SJÅ ;
ut SJÅ ;
gjen SJÅ ;
for SJÅ ;

ut SEIE ;

inn GÅ ;
ut GÅ ;
av GÅ ;
ved GÅ ;
be GÅ ;
for GÅ ;

ut BE ;
fra BE ;
til BE ;
